Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201667-405
Supplemental principles of law.

(1) Unless displaced by particular provisions of the Uniform Partnership Act of 1998, the principles of law and equity supplement the act.

(2) If an obligation to pay interest arises under the act and the rate is not specified, the rate is that fixed pursuant to section 45-103.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB247, § 1.

Under the former law, if an obligation to pay interest arises and the rate is not specified, the rate is that specified in section 45-104.01. Robertson v. Jacobs Cattle Co., 285 Neb. 859, 830 N.W.2d 191 (2013).